Georgia statutes. 
(2) A statement showing that the area to be annexed meets the requirements of Code Section 36-36-54; and

(3) A statement setting forth the plans of the municipal corporation for extending to the area to be annexed each major municipal service performed within the municipality at the time of annexation.

(c) The plans required in subsection (a) of this Code section shall:

(1) Provide for extending police protection, fire protection, garbage collection, and street maintenance services to the area to be annexed, on the date of annexation, on substantially the same basis and in the same manner as such services are provided within the rest of the municipality prior to annexation. If a water distribution system is not available in the area to be annexed, the plans must call for reasonable, effective fire protection services until such time as water lines are made available in such area under existing municipal policies for the extension of water lines;

(2) Provide for extension of major trunk water mains and sewer outfall lines into the area to be annexed so that when such lines are constructed property owners in the area to be annexed will be able to secure public water and sewer service, according to the policies in effect in such municipality for extending water and sewer lines to individual lots or subdivisions;

(3) If extension of major trunk water mains and sewer outfall lines into the area to be annexed is necessary, set forth a proposed timetable for construction of such mains and outfalls as soon as possible following the effective date of annexation. In any event, the plans shall call for contracts to be let and construction to begin within 18 months following the effective date of annexation; and

(4) Set forth the methods under which the municipal corporation plans to finance extension of services into the area to be annexed.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-36-46; Code 1981, § 36-36-56, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "subsection" was substituted for "Code section" in paragraph (b)(1).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 28 C.J.S., Drains, § 16 et seq. 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 63 et seq., 76.

36-36-57. Adoption of annexation resolution by municipal corporation; contents of resolutions; approval, availability, and distribution of report relating to extension of services; conduct of public hearing.

Statute text

(a) Any municipal governing body desiring to annex territory pursuant to this article shall first pass a resolution stating the intent of the municipal corporation to consider annexation. The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area under consideration and fix a date for a public hearing on the question of annexation. The date for the public hearing shall be not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days following passage of the resolution. The notice of the public hearing shall (1) fix the date, hour, and place of a public hearing, (2) describe clearly the boundaries of the area under consideration, and (3) state that the report required in Code Section 36-36-56 will be available at the office of the municipal clerk at least 14 days prior to the date of the public hearing. The notice shall be given by publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality once a week for three successive weeks prior to the date of the hearing. The date of the last publication shall be not more than seven days preceding the date of public hearing. If there is no such newspaper, the municipal corporation shall post the notice in at least three public places within the municipality and in at least three public places in the area to be annexed for 30 days prior to the date of the public hearing.

(b) At least 14 days before the date of the public hearing, the governing body shall approve the report provided for in Code Section 36-36-56 and shall make it available to the public at the office of the municipal clerk. In addition, the municipal corporation may prepare a summary of the full report for public distribution.

(c) At the public hearing, a representative of the municipal corporation shall first make an explanation of the report required in Code Section 36-36-56. Following such explanation, all persons resident or owning property in the territory described in the notice of public hearing and all residents of the municipality shall be given an opportunity to be heard.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 5; Code 1981, § 36-36-47; Code 1981, § 36-36-57, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

Area to be annexed as set forth in initial resolution. - Use of "under consideration" in the statute weighs against a finding that the statute requires that the area to be annexed must be set forth in finality when an initial resolution is passed. H-B Props., Ltd. v. City of Roswell, 247 Ga. App. 851, 545 S.E.2d 37 (2001).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 58 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 73 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel to question validity of proceedings extending boundaries of municipality, 101 A.L.R. 581.

What constitutes newspaper of "general circulation" within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 A.L.R.4th 822.

36-36-58. Referendum for ratification or rejection of annexation resolution generally; procedure; subsequent annexation attempt.

Statute text

The municipal corporation shall issue a call for a referendum to ratify or reject the adoption of the annexation resolution. The referendum shall be held not less than 30 days nor more than 60 days after the date of the public hearing required by Code Section 36-36-57. The referendum shall be held, insofar as possible, under the procedures set forth in Chapter 2 of Title 21 for special elections. Only those persons registered to vote for members of the General Assembly residing, on the date of the adoption of the resolution, in the proposed area to be annexed shall vote in the referendum. If a majority of those voting vote in favor of annexation, the area shall become a part of the corporate limits of the municipality, but not otherwise. If a majority of those voting vote against the annexation, a period of two years must elapse before annexation of the same area or any portion thereof may be attempted again under authority of this article.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 12; Code 1981, § 36-36-48; Code 1981, § 36-36-58, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 3.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Elections, T. 21, C. 2.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 82 et seq. 82 C.J.S., Statutes, §§ 142, 143, 159.

36-36-59. Filing of identification of annexed territory with Department of Community Affairs and county governing authority.

Statute text

Whenever the limits of a municipal corporation are enlarged in accordance with this article, it shall be the duty of the clerk, city attorney, or other person designated by the governing authority of the municipal corporation to cause an identification of the annexed territory to be filed with the Department of Community Affairs and with the governing authority of the county in which the property is located in accordance with Code Section 36-36-3.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 6; Code 1981, § 36-36-49; Code 1981, § 36-36-59, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 10.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "is" was deleted following "territory".

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 104 et seq.

36-36-60. Authorized expenditures relating to annexation.

Statute text

Any municipal corporation initiating annexations under this article is authorized to make expenditures for surveys required to describe the property under consideration or for any other purpose necessary to plan for the study and annexation of unincorporated territory adjacent to the municipal corporation. In addition, following final passage of the annexation ordinance, the annexing municipal corporation shall have authority to proceed with expenditures for construction of water and sewer lines and other capital facilities and for any other purpose calculated to bring services into the annexed area in an effective and expeditious manner prior to the effective date of annexation.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 7; Code 1981, § 36-36-50; Code 1981, § 36-36-60, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-50 as present Code Section 36-36-60.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 104 et seq.

36-36-61. Restriction on applicability of article.

Statute text

This article shall not apply to any territory which has been a part of a municipal corporation for three years immediately preceding July 1, 1970, and which has been or is in the process of being deannexed from the corporate limits of any such municipal corporation.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 11; Code 1981, § 36-36-51; Code 1981, § 36-36-61, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-51 as present Code Section 36-36-61.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

Cited in City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014); City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

——————————

ARTICLE 5

LIMITATION ON ANNEXATION OF AREAS FURNISHED SERVICES OR INCLUDED IN COMPREHENSIVE ZONING PLAN BY CERTAIN COUNTIES

Annotations

Cross references. - Time limit for reannexing property which has been deannexed by the General Assembly, § 36-35-2(b).

36-36-70. Approval by governing authority in certain counties for annexation of areas furnished services or included in comprehensive zoning plan; right of property owners to file action for injunction.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2004, p. 398, § 1, effective May 13, 2004.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1971, p. 4112, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 4357, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 4237, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-36-70, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 39; Ga. L. 1989, p. 153, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1473, § 1.

——————————

ARTICLE 6

ANNEXATION OF UNINCORPORATED ISLANDS

Annotations

Cross references. - Time limit for reannexing property which has been deannexed by the General Assembly, § 36-35-2(b).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Unincorporated areas divided by railroad right-of-way. - When there was no evidence that railroad right-of-way dividing two large unincorporated areas had been annexed to the city by a local statute of the General Assembly or under applicable general statutes, it was an unincorporated strip of land and the two unincorporated areas it traversed formed an unincorporated area in excess of fifty acres which the city could not lawfully annex by an ordinance passed under O.C.G.A. Art. 6, Ch. 36, T. 36. Culpepper v. City of Cordele, 212 Ga. App. 890, 443 S.E.2d 642 (1994).

36-36-90. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Contiguous area" means any unincorporated area which, on or after January 1, 1999, had an aggregate external boundary directly abutting a municipal boundary. Any area shall be considered "contiguous" if the aggregate external boundary would directly abut the municipal boundary if not otherwise separated, in whole or in part, from the municipal boundary by lands owned by the municipal corporation, by lands owned by a county, or by lands owned by this state or by the definite width of:

(A) Any street or street right of way;

(B) Any creek or river; or

(C) Any right of way of a railroad or other public service corporation.

(2) "Municipal corporation" means a municipal corporation which has a population of 200 or more persons according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census.

(3) "Unincorporated island" means:

(A) An unincorporated area in existence on January 1, 1991, with its aggregate external boundaries abutting the annexing municipality;

(B) An unincorporated area in existence as of January 1, 1991, with its aggregate external boundaries abutting any combination of the annexing municipality and one or more other municipalities; or

(C) An unincorporated area in existence as of January 1, 1991, which the county governing authority has by resolution adopted not later than 90 days following July 1, 1992, that identifies any unincorporated area of the county to which the county has no reasonable means of physical access for the provision of services otherwise provided by the county governing authority solely to the unincorporated area of the county.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-90, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 11.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City of Ft. Oglethorpe v. Boger, 267 Ga. 485, 480 S.E.2d 186 (1997).

36-36-91. Area included in determining aggregate external boundary.

Statute text

For the purposes of determining the aggregate external boundary of an unincorporated area, all real property in the area to be annexed, which at the time the annexation procedures are initiated, (1) is unincorporated, and (2) is in the same county as the annexing municipal corporation, shall have its area included in determining the aggregate external boundary.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-91, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

36-36-92. Annexation of unincorporated islands; procedures; provision of municipal services.

Statute text

(a) The governing body of each municipal corporation of the state may annex to the existing corporate limits thereof all or any portion of unincorporated islands which are contiguous to the existing limits at the time of such annexation upon compliance with the procedures set forth in this article and in accordance with the procedures provided in Article 1 of this chapter.

(b) Annexation of unincorporated islands as authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be accomplished by ordinance at a regular meeting of the municipal governing authority within 30 days after written notice of intent to annex such property is mailed to the owner of such property at the last known address for such owner as it appears on the ad valorem tax records of the county in which such property is located. After the adoption of the annexation ordinance, an identification of the property annexed shall be filed with the Department of Community Affairs and with the governing authority of the county in which the property is located, in accordance with Code Section 36-36-3.

(c) Annexation of an unincorporated island as authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section, which unincorporated island directly abuts more than one municipality, shall be by the municipality which abuts the unincorporated island along the greatest percentage of its external boundary as provided in this Code section, unless otherwise agreed to by the affected municipalities.

(d) Annexations under this article shall be at the sole discretion of the governing body of each municipality.

(e) Municipal services to the annexed area shall be provided on substantially the same basis and in the same manner as such services are provided within the rest of the municipal corporation; provided, however, that the extension of water and sewer services shall be according to the policies in effect in such municipal corporation for extending water and sewer lines to individual lots and subdivisions.

(f) The provisions of this article with regard to annexation of unincorporated islands are severable as to each city and to the annexation of each unincorporated island therein.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-92, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 840, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 12; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 6-5/HB 252; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 36/SB 52.)

Annotations

The 2019 amendment, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted "provided, however, that the extension" for "provided, however, the extension" in subsection (e) and substituted "islands are severable" for "islands is severable" in subsection (f).

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "city" was substituted for "City" in the first sentence of subsection (f).

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.'"

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 353 (2003). For annual survey of administrative law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2005). For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005). For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2005).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Notice. - Owners of property annexed by a city did not show, under O.C.G.A. § 36-36-92(b), that the owners did not receive proper notice of the public meeting at which the annexation ordinance was adopted because the statute required that annexation occur no later than 30 days after notice was mailed to the owners, rather than no less than 30 days, as the owners argued, and the owners clearly received notice of the annexation within the required 30-day period. Bradley Plywood Corp. v. Mayor & Aldermen of Savannah, 271 Ga. App. 828, 611 S.E.2d 105 (2005).

City complied with O.C.G.A. § 36-36-92(b) by adopting the city's annexation ordinances within 30 days of the city's formal notice of annexation. Earlier notices stating the formal notice of annexation required by § 36-36-92(b) would follow at a later date were nothing more than "courtesy" notices that did not trigger the running of the 30 days time-limit, and, as such, did not invalidate the annexation ordinances that were adopted within 30 days of the later formal notice. Calloway v. City of Fayetteville, 296 Ga. App. 200, 674 S.E.2d 66 (2009).

Annexation held proper. - By annexing a portion of a larger unincorporated area that was already qualified as an "unincorporated island," a city did not "create" a newly-formed unincorporated island in violation of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-4(a)(1), but rather simply reduced the size of a previously-existing island. Calloway v. City of Fayetteville, 296 Ga. App. 200, 674 S.E.2d 66 (2009).

Cited in City of Ft. Oglethorpe v. Boger, 267 Ga. 485, 480 S.E.2d 186 (1997).

——————————

ARTICLE 7

PROCEDURE FOR RESOLVING ANNEXATION DISPUTES

36-36-110. Applicability.

Statute text

The procedures of this article shall apply to all annexations pursuant to this chapter but shall not apply to annexations by local Acts of the General Assembly.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-110, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Validity of proposed annexation not justiciable. - City was not prevented from adopting an annexation ordinance by the statutory process of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-110 et seq., that in the absence of a declaration regarding the ordinance's alleged unconstitutionality was required to be completed before the city attempted to exercise the city's legislative power of annexation, because the parties agreed the process did not apply; therefore, the city's mere proposal of annexation, and the county's objection, did not present a justiciable controversy. Fulton County v. City of Atlanta, 299 Ga. 676, 791 S.E.2d 821 (2016).

36-36-111. Notice of annexation.

Statute text

Upon receipt of a petition of annexation, a municipal corporation shall notify the governing authority of the county in which the territory to be annexed is located by certified mail or by statutory overnight delivery. Such notice shall include a copy of the annexation petition which shall include the proposed zoning and land use for such area. The municipal corporation shall take no final action on such annexation except as otherwise provided in this article.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-111, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

36-36-112. Prohibition on a change in zoning or land use.

Statute text

If no objection is received as provided in Code Section 36-36-113, the annexation may proceed as otherwise provided by law; provided, however, that as a condition of the annexation the municipal corporation shall not change the zoning or land use plan relating to the annexed property to a more intense density than that stated in the notice provided for in Code Section 36-36-111 for one year after the effective date of the annexation unless such change is made in the service delivery agreement or comprehensive plan and is adopted by the affected city and county and all required parties.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-112, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

36-36-113. Objection to annexation; grounds and procedures.

Statute text

(a) The county governing authority may by majority vote object to the annexation because of a material increase in burden upon the county directly related to any one or more of the following:

(1) The proposed change in zoning or land use;

(2) Proposed increase in density; and

(3) Infrastructure demands related to the proposed change in zoning or land use.

(b) Delivery of services may not be a basis for a valid objection but may be used in support of a valid objection if directly related to one or more of the subjects enumerated in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

(c) The objection provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall document the nature of the objection specifically providing evidence of any financial impact forming the basis of the objection and shall be delivered to the municipal governing authority by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to be received not later than the end of the thirtieth calendar day following receipt of the notice provided for in Code Section 36-36-111.

(d) In order for an objection pursuant to this Code section to be valid, the proposed change in zoning or land use must:

(1) Result in:

(A) A substantial change in the intensity of the allowable use of the property or a change to a significantly different allowable use; or

(B) A use which significantly increases the net cost of infrastructure or significantly diminishes the value or useful life of a capital outlay project, as such term is defined in Code Section 48-8-110, which is furnished by the county to the area to be annexed; and

(2) Differ substantially from the existing uses suggested for the property by the county's comprehensive land use plan or permitted for the property pursuant to the county's zoning ordinance or its land use ordinances.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-113, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

36-36-114. Arbitration panel; composition and membership.

Statute text

(a) Not later than the fifteenth calendar day following the date the municipal corporation received the first objection provided for in Code Section 36-36-113, an arbitration panel shall be appointed as provided in this Code section.

(b) The arbitration panel shall be composed of five members to be selected as provided in this subsection. The Department of Community Affairs shall develop three pools of arbitrators, one pool which consists of persons who are currently or within the previous six years have been municipal elected officials, one pool which consists of persons who are currently or within the previous six years have been county elected officials, and one pool which consists of persons with a master's degree or higher in public administration or planning and who are currently employed by an institution of higher learning in this state, other than the Carl Vinson Institute of Government. The pool shall be sufficiently large to ensure as nearly as practicable that no person shall be required to serve on more than two panels in any one calendar year and serve on no more than one panel in any given county in any one calendar year. The department is authorized to coordinate with the Georgia Municipal Association, the Association County Commissioners of Georgia, the Council of Local Governments, and similar organizations in developing and maintaining such pools.

(c) Upon receiving notice of a disputed annexation, the department shall choose at random four names from the pool of municipal officials, four names from the pool of county officials, and three names from the pool of academics; provided, however, that none of such selections shall include a person who is a resident of the county which has interposed the objection or any municipal corporation located wholly or partially in such county. The municipal corporation shall be permitted to strike or excuse two of the names chosen from the county officials pool; the county shall be permitted to strike or excuse two of the names chosen from the municipal officials pool; and the county and municipal corporation shall each be permitted to strike or excuse one of the names chosen from the academic pool.

(d) Prior to being eligible to serve on any of the three pools, persons interested in serving on such panels shall receive joint training in alternative dispute resolution together with zoning and land use training, which may be designed and overseen by the Carl Vinson Institute of Government in conjunction with the Association County Commissioners of Georgia and the Georgia Municipal Association, provided such training is available.

(e) At the time any person is selected to serve on a panel for any particular annexation dispute, he or she shall sign the following oath: "I do solemnly swear or affirm that I will faithfully perform my duties as an arbitrator in a fair and impartial manner without favor or affection to any party, and that I have not and will not have any ex parte communication regarding the facts and circumstances of the matters to be determined, other than communications with my fellow arbitrators, and will only consider, in making my determination, those matters which may lawfully come before me."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-114, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

36-36-115. Meetings of arbitration panel; duties; findings and recommendations; compensation.

Statute text

(a) (1) The arbitration panel appointed pursuant to Code Section 36-36-114 shall meet as soon after appointment as practicable and shall receive evidence and argument from the municipal corporation, the county, and the applicant or property owner and shall by majority vote render a decision which shall be binding on all parties to the dispute as provided for in this article not later than the sixtieth day following such appointment. The meetings of the panel in which evidence is submitted or arguments of the parties are made shall be open to the public pursuant to Chapter 14 of Title 50. The panel shall first determine the validity of the grounds for objection as specified in the objection. If an objection involves the financial impact on the county as a result of a change in zoning or land use or the provision of maintenance of infrastructure, the panel shall quantify such impact in terms of cost. As to any objection which the panel has determined to be valid, the panel, in its findings, may establish reasonable zoning, land use, or density conditions applicable to the annexation and propose any reasonable mitigating measures as to an objection pertaining to infrastructure demands.

(2) In arriving at its determination, the panel shall consider:

(A) The existing comprehensive land use plans of both the county and city;

(B) The existing land use patterns in the area of the subject property;

(C) The existing zoning patterns in the area of the subject property;

(D) Each jurisdiction's provision of infrastructure to the area of the subject property;

(E) Whether the county has approved similar changes in intensity or allowable uses on similar developments in other unincorporated areas of the county;

(F) Whether the county has approved similar developments in other unincorporated areas of the county which have a similar impact on infrastructure as complained of by the county in its objection; and

(G) Whether the infrastructure or capital outlay project which is claimed adversely impacted by the county in its objection was funded by a county-wide tax.

(3) The county shall provide supporting evidence that its objection is consistent with its land use plan and the pattern of existing land uses and zonings in the area of the subject property.

(4) The county shall bear at least 75 percent of the cost of the arbitration. The panel shall apportion the remaining 25 percent of the cost of the arbitration equitably between the city and the county as the facts of the appeal warrant; provided, however, that if the panel determines that any party has advanced a position that is substantially frivolous, the costs shall be borne by the party that has advanced such position.

(5) The reasonable costs of participation in the arbitration process of the property owner or owners whose property is at issue shall be borne by the county and the city in the same proportion as costs are apportioned under paragraph (4) of this subsection.

(6) The panel shall deliver its findings and recommendations to the parties by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery.

(b) If the decision of the panel contains zoning, land use, or density conditions, the findings and recommendations of the panel shall be recorded in the deed records of the county with a caption describing the name of the current owner of the property, recording reference of the current owner's acquisition deed and a general description of the property, and plainly showing the expiration date of any restrictions or conditions.

(c) The arbitration panel shall be dissolved on the tenth day after it renders its findings and recommendations but may be reconvened as provided in Code Section 36-36-116.

(d) The members of the arbitration panel shall receive the same per diem, expenses, and allowances for their service on the committee as is authorized by law for members of interim legislative study committees.

(e) If the panel so agrees, any one or more additional annexation disputes which may arise between the parties prior to the panel's initial meeting may be consolidated for the purpose of judicial economy if there are similar issues of location or similar objections raised to such other annexations or the property to be annexed in such other annexations is within 2,500 feet of the subject property.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-115, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

36-36-116. Appeal.

Statute text

The municipal or county governing authority or an applicant for annexation may appeal the decision of the arbitration panel by filing an action in the superior court of the county within ten calendar days from receipt of the panel's findings and recommendations. The sole grounds for appeal shall be to correct errors of fact or of law, the bias or misconduct of an arbitrator, or the panel's abuse of discretion. The superior court shall schedule an expedited appeal and shall render a decision within 20 days from the date of filing. If the court finds that an error of fact or law has been made, that an arbitrator was biased or engaged in misconduct, or that the panel has abused its discretion, the court shall issue such orders governing the proposed annexation as the circumstances may require, including remand to the panel. Any unappealed order shall be binding upon the parties. The appeal shall be assigned to a judge who is not a judge in the circuit in which the county is located.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-116, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

36-36-117. Annexation after conclusion of procedures; remedies for violations of conditions.

Statute text

If the annexation is completed after final resolution of any objection, whether by agreement of the parties, act of the panel, or court order as a result of an appeal, the municipal corporation shall not change the zoning, land use, or density of the annexed property for a period of one year unless such change is made in the service delivery agreement or comprehensive plan and adopted by the affected city and county and all required parties. Following the conclusion of the dispute resolution process outlined in this article, the municipal corporation and an applicant for annexation may either accept the recommendations of the arbitration panel and proceed with the remaining annexation process or abandon the annexation proceeding. A violation of the conditions set forth in this Code section may be enforced thereafter at law or in equity until such conditions have expired as provided in this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-117, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

36-36-118. Abandonment of proposed annexation; remedies for violations of conditions.

Statute text

If at any time during the proceedings the municipal corporation or applicant abandons the proposed annexation, the county shall not change the zoning, land use, or density affecting the property for a period of one year unless such change is made in the service delivery agreement or comprehensive plan and adopted by the affected city and county and all required parties. A violation of the conditions set forth in this Code section may be enforced thereafter at law or in equity until such period has expired. After final resolution of any objection, whether by agreement of the parties, act of the panel, or any appeal from the panel's decision, the terms of such decision shall remain valid for the one-year period and such annexation may proceed at any time during the one year without any further action or without any further right of objection by the county.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-118, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

36-36-119. Good faith negotiations; written agreement governing terms of annexation.

Statute text

The county, the municipal governing authorities, and the property owner or owners shall negotiate in good faith throughout the annexation proceedings provided by this article and may at any time enter into a written agreement governing the annexation. If such agreement is reached after the arbitration panel has been appointed and before its dissolution, such agreement shall be adopted by the panel as its findings and recommendations. If such agreement is reached after an appeal is filed in the superior court and before the court issues an order, such agreement shall be made a part of the court's order. Any agreement reached as provided in this Code section shall be recorded as provided in Code Section 36-36-115.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-119, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 2/HB 2.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

——————————

CHAPTER 37

ACQUISITION AND DISPOSITION OF REAL AND PERSONAL PROPERTY GENERALLY

Sec.

36-37-1. Devises, gifts, and grants of property for parks or other public purposes.

36-37-2. Acceptance of donations or gifts of property generally.

36-37-3. Municipal corporations as trustees for donated or gifted property generally.

36-37-4. Receipt of cemetery or burial lots in trust; annual returns; commissions.

36-37-5. Municipal corporation as trustee of funds donated to cemetery.

36-37-6. Disposition of municipal property generally.

36-37-6.1. Sale, exchange, lease, or grant of easement over property used for recreational purposes by incorporated municipalities having population greater than 300,000.

36-37-6.2. Purchase or other acquisition of real property on time or partly for cash; securing of balance; limitation on liability.

36-37-7. Disposition of public utility plants or properties - Power generally; effect of charter restrictions.

36-37-8. Disposition of public utility plants or properties - Notice of intent to dispose; petition objecting to disposition; election and notice.

36-37-9. Disposition of public utility plants or properties - Ballots for election.
